Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1447
Office of Violence
Prevention; established; director; advisory council; members; terms; vacancy.

(1) There
is established within the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice the Office of Violence Prevention. The office shall consist of a director, appointed by the executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice, and other necessary support staff. There
also is established an advisory council to the Office of Violence Prevention.
The members of the advisory council shall be appointed by the Governor and
serve at his or her discretion. The advisory council shall consist of six
members and, of those members, each congressional district, as such districts
existed on May 28, 2009, shall have at least one member on the council. The
Governor shall consider appointing members representing the following areas,
if practicable: Two members representing local government; two members representing
law enforcement; one member representing community advocacy; and one member
representing education with some expertise in law enforcement and juvenile
crime.

(2) Members of the advisory
council shall serve for terms of four years. A member may be reappointed at
the expiration of his or her term. Any vacancy occurring other than by expiration
of a term shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same
manner as the original appointment.

Laws 2009, LB63, § 37;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 20.